Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 717B.3A, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. A person is guilty of animal torture if the person intentionally, willfully, and maliciously mutilates, burns, poisons, drowns, starves, or causes intensive or prolonged pain or death to a companion animal, or causes, directs, or provides anything of value to another person to do the same. Sec. 2. Section 717B.3A, subsections 4 and 5, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 4. A person who commits animal torture in violation of subsection 1 is guilty of an aggravated misdemeanor. A person who commits animal torture in violation of subsection 1A is guilty of a class âDâ felony. 5. Notwithstanding subsection 4 , a person who commits animal torture is guilty of a class âDâ felony shall be guilty of an offense one degree higher than the underlying offense if the person has previously been convicted of committing animal abuse pursuant to section 717B.2 , animal neglect punishable as a serious misdemeanor or aggravated misdemeanor pursuant to section 717B.3 , animal torture pursuant to this section , injury to or interference with a police service dog pursuant to House File 2348, p. 2 section 717B.9 , bestiality pursuant to section 717C.1 , or an act involving a contest event prohibited in section 717D.2 . ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2348, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor